New York, session 2025-2026, A517.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 612 of the tax law is amended by 2 adding a new paragraph 48 to read as follows: 3 (48) In the case of a taxpayer who is a small business, an amount 4 equal to the amount paid by such taxpayer as dues to the local chamber 5 of commerce within which such business is located, provided that such 6 chamber of commerce is incorporated under section fourteen hundred ten 7 of the not-for-profit corporation law. The amount deductible pursuant to 8 this paragraph shall not include any portion of the amount of dues paid 9 by the taxpayer that are used or intended to be used for the purposes of 10 lobbying. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "small business" 11 shall mean a business with fifty employees or less. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 13 years beginning on or after January 1, 2027. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01399-01-5